Tennessee, session 114, HB0201.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 71-5-165, is amended by deleting
subsection (a) and substituting:
(a) The bureau of TennCare shall reimburse a public or private ground-based
ambulance service that bills for transports and has a base of operations in this state that
provides a covered emergency service to a TennCare recipient at a rate not less than
sixty-seven and one-half percent (67.5%) of the federal medicare program's allowable
charge for participating providers. The bureau of TennCare shall reimburse a public or
private ground-based ambulance service that bills for transports and has a base of
operations in this state that provides a covered nonemergency service to a TennCare
recipient at a rate not less than one hundred percent (100%) of the federal medicare
program's allowable charge for participating providers.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0201
000160
- 1 -